Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1401.37
Trailer dealer, defined.

Trailer dealer
means any person, other than a bona fide consumer, actively and regularly
engaged in the business of selling or exchanging new or used trailers and
manufactured homes.

Laws 2010, LB816, § 49.